Florida, session 2026, HB1145.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 186.801, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1145-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1145 2026
186.801 Ten-year site plans.—
(1) Each electric utility shall submit to the Public
Service Commission a 10-year site plan which estimates its
anticipated demand, shall estimate its power-generating needs,
the impact of planned demand-side management measures on such
generating needs, and the general location of its proposed power
plant sites. The 10-year plan must shall be submitted and
reviewed at least and submitted not less frequently than every 2
years.
(2) Within 9 months after the receipt of a 10-year site
the proposed plan, the commission shall issue a final order
approving, approving with amendments, or rejecting make a
preliminary study of such plan and classify it as "suitable" or
"unsuitable." The commission may suggest alternatives to the
plan.
(a) When deciding whether to approve a 10-year site plan,
the commission shall make a determination whether the plan is
reasonable and in the best interest of the utility's customers
and this state.
(b) The commission may reject a 10-year site plan if it
fails to satisfy the requirements of this section and commission
rules.
(c) Within 60 days after the receipt of a final order
rejecting a 10-year site plan, an electric utility shall submit
a revised plan to the commission for approval.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1145-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1145 2026
(d) The commission shall hold a public hearing for a 10-
year site plan submitted by a public utility as defined in s.
366.02.
(e) The commission may hold a public hearing for a 10-year
site plan submitted by any electric utility upon a petition or
request for a hearing. Notwithstanding chapter 120 or any other
law, the commission shall grant the petition or request if
participation by the party submitting the petition or request is
in the public interest and will not unduly impair the efficiency
or administration of the proceeding.
(3) All findings of the commission shall be made available
to the Department of Environmental Protection for its
consideration at any subsequent electrical power plant site
certification proceedings.
(4) It is recognized that 10-year site plans submitted by
an electric utility are tentative information for planning
purposes only and may be amended and submitted for approval at
any time at the discretion of the utility upon written
notification to the commission. An electric utility may not file
an A complete application for certification of an electrical
power plant site under chapter 403 that, when such site is not
designated in the current 10-year site plan of the applicant,
shall constitute an amendment to the 10-year site plan.
(5) In its review preliminary study of each 10-year site
plan, the commission shall consider all of the following such
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1145-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1145 2026
plan as a planning document and shall review:
(a) The need, including the need as determined by the
commission, for electrical power in the area to be served.
(b) The adequacy and cost-effectiveness of planned
generation, transmission, and distribution resources relative to
other available options.
(c) The benefits of energy resources sited within this
state that reduce this state's reliance on energy and fuels
imported from outside this state.
(d) The impact of the plan on future regulatory risks and
compliance costs and the impacts of those risks and costs on the
utility's customers.
(e) The adequacy of total demand-side management measures
proposed by the utility to mitigate its need for new generation.
(f)(b) The effect on fuel diversity within this the state.
(g)(c) The anticipated environmental impact of each
proposed electrical power plant site.
(h)(d) Possible alternatives to the proposed plan,
including alternative technologies for proposed resources.
(i)(e) The views of appropriate local, state, and federal
agencies, including the views of the appropriate water
management district as to the availability of water and its
recommendation as to the use by the proposed plant of salt water
or fresh water for cooling purposes.
100 (j)(f) The extent to which the plan is consistent with the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1145-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1145 2026
101 state comprehensive plan.
102 (k)(g) The plan with respect to the information of the
103 state on energy availability and consumption.
104 (l)(h) The amount of renewable energy resources the
105 utility produces or purchases.
106 (m)(i) The amount of renewable energy resources the
107 utility plans to produce or purchase over the 10-year planning
108 horizon and the means by which the production or purchases will
109 be achieved.
110 (n)(j) A statement describing how the production and
111 purchase of renewable energy resources impact the utility's
112 present and future capacity and energy needs.
113 (6)(3) In order to enable it to carry out its duties under
114 this section, the commission may, after hearing, establish an
115 administrative a study fee which may shall not exceed $100,000
116 $1,000 for each proposed plan studied.
117 (7)(4) The commission may adopt rules governing the method
118 of submitting, processing, and approving studying the 10-year
119 plans as required by this section, including the required
120 contents and approval of such plans and procedures for
121 intervention and discovery in the plan review proceedings.
122 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1145-00